Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-721
Natural area; use; hearing required.

The maintenance of a registered natural area in its natural state is hereby declared to be the highest, best, and most important use of the natural area. No entity of local or state government may undertake any activities or use the registered natural area in any way that would negatively impact the values of the natural area without first conducting a public hearing on such negative impact and filing with the secretary of the commission a statement justifying the negative impact on the natural area of such activities or use.

Laws 1989, LB 251, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 826, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1408;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 335.